West Virginia, session 2026, HB4253.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-1C-5 of this code, modified by the Tax Department to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Tax Department (valuation of public utility property for ad valorem property tax purposes, 110 CSR 01M), is authorized.